Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.686] IMMUNITY FROM CRIMINAL LIABILITY FOR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WHEN PROVIDING HEALTH TREATMENT AND SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "health care provider" means a health professional who is licensed or registered by the state to provide health treatment and services within the professional's scope of practice and in accordance with state law. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Immunity from criminal liability. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a health care provider providing health treatment and services shall be immune from criminal liability for any harm or damages alleged to arise from an act or omission relating to the provision of health treatment and services, except as provided in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section limits any liability for gross negligence; wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct; or intentional violation of law. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend, repeal, or alter any other immunity, defense, limitation of liability, or procedure available or required under any other law or contract. new text end